Utah statutes.
51-9-303.   Creation of Infrastructure and Economic Diversification
Investment Account.
(1) (a)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known
as the "Infrastructure and Economic Diversification Investment Account."
(b)  The Infrastructure and Economic Diversification Investment Account shall
consist of:
(i)  all money credited to the account under Section 51-9-305;
(ii)  appropriations from the Legislature; and
(iii)  grants from private foundations.
(2) (a)  The state treasurer shall invest money in the account according to
Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.
(b)  The Division of Finance shall deposit interest or other earnings derived
from investment of account money into the General Fund.
(3)  The Legislature may appropriate money from the Infrastructure and
Economic Diversification Investment Account for infrastructure and economic
diversification investment projects.
(4)  At least 25% of the money appropriated in accordance with Subsection (3)
shall be used for the following projects within areas of the state that
produced the severance tax revenues:
(a)  capital and infrastructure development; and
(b)  economic diversification investment.
